District of Columbia statutes.
16-906

Causes for absolute divorce arising after decree for separation.

Where a legal separation has been decreed the court may afterwards decree an absolute divorce between the parties for any cause arising since the first decree and sufficient to entitle the complaining party to the second decree.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 561, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-207, § 2(d), 49 DCR 7827
1981 Ed., § 16-906.
1973 Ed., § 16-906.
D.C. Law 14-207 substituted “legal separation” for “divorce from bed and board”.